src/morphology/stems/numeral_symbols.lexc
! Copyright © 2015–2019 Alberta Language Technology Lab (ALTLab)
! http://altlab.artsrn.ualberta.ca/
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version.
!
! This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
! but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
! MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
! GNU Affero General Public License for more details.
!
! You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
! along with this program. If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

! ========================================================================== !
!!                           !!!Plains Cree numerals                           
! ========================================================================== !

!! !!The file for Arabic, Roman, and other symbolic numerals

! Arabic numerals
! ---------------
LEXICON NUM-PREFIXES   !!= * __@CODE@__
    §:§      ARABIC ; ! §24
   §§:§§     ARABIC ; ! §§24
  §% :§%     ARABIC ; ! § 24
 §§% :§§%    ARABIC ; ! §§ 24
   %-:%-     ARABIC ; ! -24
   %‒:%‒     ARABIC ; ! -24 U+2012
   %–:%–     ARABIC ; ! -24 U+2013
   %—:%—     ARABIC ; ! -24 U+2014
   %―:%―     ARABIC ; ! -24 U+2015
   %+:%+     ARABIC ; ! <plus>24
 %-% :%-%    ARABIC ; ! - 24
 %‒% :%‒%    ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2012
 %–% :%–%    ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2013
 %—% :%—%    ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2014
 %―% :%―%    ARABIC ; ! - 24 U+2015
 %+% :%+%    ARABIC ; ! <plus> 24
   %*:%*     ARABIC ; ! *24
   %$:%$     ARABIC ; ! $24
   %€:%€     ARABIC ; ! €24
   %<:%[%<%] ARABIC ; ! <24
   %>:%[%>%] ARABIC ; ! >24
  s%.:s%.    ARABIC ; ! s.24

LEXICON ARABIC   !!= * __@CODE@__ arabic numerals
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICLOOP      ;
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICLOOPORD   ;
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICLOOPphone ;

LEXICON ARABICLOOPphone   !!= * __@CODE@__ +358(0)16671254
< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICLOOPphone ;
!  :              ARABICLOOPphone ; ! Infinite loop on the surface side
  (:(             ARABICLOOPphone ;
  ):)             ARABICLOOPphone ;
 %—:%—            ARABICLOOPphone ; 
                  ARABICCASEphone ;

LEXICON ARABICCASEphone   !!= * __@CODE@__  
 +Num+Arab: # ;

LEXICON ARABICLOOP   !!= * __@CODE@__
         :         ARABIC ;
       %-:%-       ARABIC ; ! 1-2 multipart numbers
       %–:%–       ARABIC ; ! 1–2 multipart numbers
       %—:%—       ARABIC ; ! 1—2 multipart numbers
     %.%-:%.%-     ARABIC ; ! 1.-2 multipart numbers ! !
     %.%–:%.%–     ARABIC ; ! 1.–2 multipart numbers ! !
     %.%—:%.%—     ARABIC ; ! 1.—2 multipart numbers ! !
     %-% :%-%      ARABIC ; ! 1- 2 multipart numbers
     %–% :%–%      ARABIC ; ! 1– 2 multipart numbers
     %—% :%—%      ARABIC ; ! 1— 2 multipart numbers
     % %-:% %-     ARABIC ; ! 1 -2 multipart numbers
     % %–:% %–     ARABIC ; ! 1 –2 multipart numbers
     % %—:% %—     ARABIC ; ! 1 —2 multipart numbers
   % %-% :% %-%    ARABIC ; ! 1 - 2 multipart numbers
   % %–% :% %–%    ARABIC ; ! 1 – 2 multipart numbers
   % %—% :% %—%    ARABIC ; ! 1 — 2 multipart numbers
 % %-%-% :% %-%-%  ARABIC ; ! 1 -- 2 multipart numbers
 % %–%–% :% %–%–%  ARABIC ; ! 1 –– 2 multipart numbers
 % %—%—% :% %—%—%  ARABIC ; ! 1 —— 2 multipart numbers
       %.:%.       ARABIC ;
       %::%:       ARABIC ;
       %,:%,       ARABIC ;
       % :%        ARABIC ; ! Allowing for "23 500".
         :         ARABIC ; ! Allowing for "23 500" w/nbsp (init char = alt-space)
       %/:%/       ARABIC ; ! 24/12
     %/% :%/%      ARABIC ; ! 24/ 12
     % %/:% %/     ARABIC ; ! 24 /12
        ':'        ARABIC ; ! 24'12
!     +Num:         RNum   ; ! Num Cmp Noun, with hyphen

   % %-+Err/Orth:% %-   NUMARABTAG ; ! 1 - multipart numbers - "1 -:s"?
 % %-%-+Err/Orth:% %-%- NUMARABTAG ; ! 1 -- multipart numbers
              %%:%%     NUMARABTAG ; ! 50%. 
            % %%+Err/Orth:% %%   NUMARABTAG ; !  50 % etc.
                        NUMARABTAG ; ! list of number-case delimiters

LEXICON ARABICLOOPORD   !!= * __@CODE@__ ordinals
 +Num+Ord:%. # ;
 < [a|b|c|d|e|f|f %  f] > NUMARABTAG ;

LEXICON NUMARABTAG   !!= * __@CODE@__ 
+Num+Arab: # ;
! +Num:     Rhyph ; ! 3-







! The Roman numerals !
! ------------------ !

LEXICON ROMAN						!^C^
 : ROM-THOUSAND ;						!
 : ROM-HUNDRED ;						!
 : ROM-TEN ;							!
 : ROM-ONE ;							!

LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND              	!^C^
 M:M ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;				!
 MM:MM ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;				!
 MMM:MMM ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;				!
 MMMM:MMMM ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;			!
 MMMMM:MMMMM ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;			!

LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND-TAG			!^C^
 : ROMNUMTAG ;						!
 : ROM-HUNDRED ;						!
 : ROM-SPLIT	;						!

LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED					!^C^
 C:C ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;				!
 CC:CC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;				!
 CCC:CCC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;				!
 CD:CD ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;				!
 D:D ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;				!
 DC:DC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;				!
 DCC:DCC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;				!
 DCCC:DCCC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;				!
 CM:CM ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;				!

LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED-TAG				!^C^
 : ROMNUMTAG ;						!
 : ROM-TEN ;							!
 : ROM-SPLIT ;						!

LEXICON ROM-TEN						!^C^
 X:X ROM-TEN-TAG ;					!
 XX:XX ROM-TEN-TAG ;					!
 XXX:XXX ROM-TEN-TAG ;					!
 XL:XL ROM-TEN-TAG ;					!
 L:L ROM-TEN-TAG ;					!
 LX:LX ROM-TEN-TAG ;					!
 LXX:LXX ROM-TEN-TAG ;					!
 LXXX:LXXX ROM-TEN-TAG ;					!
 XC:XC ROM-TEN-TAG ;					!

LEXICON ROM-TEN-TAG					!^C^
 : ROMNUMTAG ;						!
 : ROM-ONE ;							!
 : ROM-SPLIT ;						!

LEXICON ROM-ONE						!^C^
 I:I ROM-ONE-TAG ;					!
 II:II ROM-ONE-TAG ;					!
 III:III ROM-ONE-TAG ;					!
 IV:IV ROM-ONE-TAG ;					!
 V:V ROM-ONE-TAG ;					!
 VI:VI ROM-ONE-TAG ;					!
 VII:VII ROM-ONE-TAG ;					!
 VIII:VIII ROM-ONE-TAG ;					!
 IX:IX ROM-ONE-TAG ;					!

LEXICON ROM-ONE-TAG					!^C^
 : ROMNUMTAG ;						!
 : ROM-SPLIT ;						!

! Here, we split the Roman numerals, in order to account for cases like "Kapihtal II-IV".
! We may send this first part directly to ROM-TAG below (and get the +Num tag), or we may
! send them through a second loop, identical to the first one, but marked wit "2" (the lexica
! are called 2ROMAN, etc. We do this instead of making a loop, since we do not want cases
! like "II-IV-VI-VII-IX". If that should turn out to be a good idea, a loop would do the 
! trick.

LEXICON ROM-SPLIT						!^C^
 :%- 2ROMAN ; ! II-VI, etc.				!


! Here goes loop 2.

LEXICON 2ROMAN							!^C^
 : 2ROM-THOUSAND ;						!
 : 2ROM-HUNDRED ;							!
 : 2ROM-TEN ;								!
 : 2ROM-ONE ;								!

LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND              		!^C^
 M:M 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;					!
 MM:MM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;					!
 MMM:MMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;				!
 MMMM:MMMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;				!
 MMMMM:MMMMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;				!

LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG				!^C^
 : ROMNUMTAG ;							!
 : 2ROM-HUNDRED ;							!

LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED					!^C^
 C:C 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;					!
 CC:CC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;					!
 CCC:CCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;					!
 CD:CD 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;					!
 D:D 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;					!
 DC:DC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;					!
 DCC:DCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;					!
 DCCC:DCCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;				!
 CM:CM 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;					!

LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG				!^C^
 : ROMNUMTAG ;							!
 : 2ROM-TEN ;								!

LEXICON 2ROM-TEN						!^C^
 X:X 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;						!
 XX:XX 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;						!
 XXX:XXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;						!
 XL:XL 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;						!
 L:L 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;						!
 LX:LX 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;						!
 LXX:LXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;						!
 LXXX:LXXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;					!
 XC:XC 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;						!

LEXICON 2ROM-TEN-TAG					!^C^
 : ROMNUMTAG ;							!
 : 2ROM-ONE ;								!

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE						!^C^
 I:I 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;						!
 II:II 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;						!
 III:III 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;						!
 IV:IV 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;						!
 V:V 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;						!
 VI:VI 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;						!
 VII:VII 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;						!
 VIII:VIII 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;					!
 IX:IX 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;						!

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE-TAG
 ROMNUMTAG ;
 
LEXICON ROMNUMTAG
 +Num+Rom: # ;


! A final section with some isolated numeral expresssions !
! ------------------------------------------------------- !

      
LEXICON ISOLATED-NUMEXP					!^C^
 ½+Num:½ # ;						!
 ¹+Num:¹ # ;						!
 ²+Num:² # ;						!
 ³+Num:³ # ;						!
 ¼+Num:¼ # ;						!
